Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1215.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 23-901.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-901.01. Occupational disease; proximate causation; presumption; definition A. The occupational diseases as defined by section 23-901, paragraph 13, subdivision (c) shall be is deemed to arise out of the employment only if all of the following six requirements exist: 1. There is a direct causal connection between the conditions under which the work is performed and the occupational disease. 2. The disease can be seen to have followed as a natural incident of the work as a result of the exposure occasioned by the nature of the employment. 3. The disease can be fairly traced to the employment as the proximate cause. 4. The disease does not come from a hazard to which workers would have been equally exposed outside of the employment. 5. The disease is incidental to the character of the business and not independent of the relation of employer and employee. 6. The disease after its contraction appears to have had its origin in a risk connected with the employment, and to have flowed from that source as a natural consequence, although it need not have been foreseen or expected. B. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section and section 23-1043.01, any disease, infirmity or impairment of a peace officer's health that is caused by brain, bladder, rectal or colon cancer, lymphoma, leukemia or adenocarcinoma or mesothelioma of the respiratory tract and that results in disability or death is presumed to be an occupational disease as defined in section 23-901, paragraph 13, subdivision (c) and is deemed to arise out of employment if the disease, infirmity or impairment is caused by any of the following: 1. Adenocarcinoma. 2. Bladder cancer. 3. Brain cancer. 4. Colon cancer. 5. Leukemia. 6. Lymphoma. 7. Mesothelioma of the respiratory tract. 8. Rectal cancer. C. The presumption provided in subsection B of this section is granted if all of the following apply: 1. The peace officer passed a physical examination before employment and the examination did not indicate evidence of cancer. 2. The peace officer was assigned to hazardous duty for at least five years. D. Subsection B of this section applies to both of the following: 1. Peace officers currently in service. 2. Former peace officers who are sixty-five years of age or younger and who are diagnosed with a cancer that is listed in subsection B of this section not more than fifteen years after the peace officer's last date of employment as a peace officer. E. Subsection B of this section does not apply to cancers of the respiratory tract if there is evidence that the peace officer's exposure to cigarettes or tobacco products outside of the scope of the peace officer's official duties is a substantial contributing cause in the development of the cancer. F. The presumption provided in subsection B of this section may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence that there is a specific cause of the cancer other than an occupational exposure to a carcinogen as defined by the international agency for research on cancer. G. For the purposes of this section, "peace officer" means a full-time peace officer who was regularly assigned to hazardous duty as a part of a special operations, special weapons and tactics, explosive ordinance disposal or hazardous materials response unit. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 23-901.09, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-901.09. Presumption; cancers; firefighters and fire investigators; applicability; definitions A. Notwithstanding section 23-901.01, subsection A and section 23-1043.01, : 1. any disease, infirmity or impairment of a firefighter's or fire investigator's health that is caused by brain, bladder, rectal or colon cancer, lymphoma, leukemia or adenocarcinoma or mesothelioma of the respiratory tract and that results in disability or death is presumed to be an occupational disease as defined in section 23-901, paragraph 13, subdivision (c) and is deemed to arise out of employment if the disease, infirmity or impairment is caused by any of the following: 1. Adenocarcinoma. 2. Bladder cancer. 3. Brain cancer. 4. Breast cancer. 5. Buccal cavity cancer. 6. Colon cancer. 7. Esophageal cancer. 8. Kidney cancer. 9. Large intestine cancer. 10. Leukemia. 11. Lung cancer. 12. Lymphoma. 13. Malignant melanoma. 14. Mesothelioma of the respiratory tract. 15. Multiple myeloma. 16. Non-hodgkin's lymphoma. 17. Ovarian cancer. 18. Pharynx cancer. 19. Prostate cancer. 20. Rectal cancer. 21. Skin cancer. 22. Stomach cancer. 23. Testicular cancer. 2. Any disease, infirmity or impairment of a firefighter's or fire investigator's health that is caused by buccal cavity, pharynx, esophagus, large intestine, lung, kidney, prostate, skin, stomach, ovarian, breast or testicular cancer or non-Hodgkin's lymphoma, multiple myeloma or malignant melanoma and that results in disability or death is presumed to be an occupational disease as defined in section 23-901, paragraph 13, subdivision (c) and is deemed to arise out of employment. B. The presumptions provided in subsection A of this section are granted if all of the following apply: 1. The firefighter or fire investigator passed a physical examination before employment and the examination did not indicate evidence of cancer. 2. The firefighter or fire investigator was assigned to hazardous duty for at least five years. 3. For the presumption provided in subsection A, paragraph 2  4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 11, 13, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 21, 22 or 23 of this section and for firefighters only, the firefighter received a physical examination that is reasonably aligned with the national fire protection association standard on comprehensive occupational medical program for fire departments (NFPA 1582). C. Subsection A of this section applies to both of the following: 1. Firefighters or fire investigators currently in service. 2. Former firefighters or fire investigators who are sixty-five years of age or younger and who are diagnosed with a cancer that is listed in subsection A of this section not more than fifteen years after the firefighter's or fire investigator's last date of employment as a firefighter or fire investigator. D. Subsection A of this section does not apply to cancers of the respiratory tract if there is evidence that the firefighter's or fire investigator's exposure to cigarettes or tobacco products outside of the scope of the firefighter's or fire investigator's official duties is a substantial contributing cause in the development of the cancer. E. The presumption provided in subsection A of this section may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence that there is a specific cause of the cancer other than an occupational exposure to a carcinogen as defined by the international agency for research on cancer. F. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Firefighter" means a full-time firefighter who was regularly assigned to hazardous duty. 2. "Fire investigator" means a person who is employed full time by a municipality or fire district and who is trained in the process of and responsible for determining the origin, cause and development of a fire or explosion. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Retroactivity Section 23-901.09, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, applies retroactively to from and after June 30, 2021. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.